en: Bicycle Cable Housings
xx: Bicycle Cable Housings
cs: Lanovody pro jízdní kola
da: Kabelholdere til cykler
de: Fahrradkabelgehäuse
es: Fundas exteriores de cables para bicicletas
fr: Gaines de câbles de vélo
it: Alloggiamenti per cavi per bicicletta
ja: 自転車用ケーブルハウジング
nl: Geleiders voor fietskabels
no: Kabelhus for sykler
pl: Osłony linek rowerowych
pt: Tubo do cabo da bicicleta
ru: Оболочки велосипедных тросов
sv: Höljen för cykelvajrar
tr: Bisiklet Kablo Kılıfları

en: Bicycle Cables
xx: Bicycle Cables
cs: Lanka pro jízdní kola
da: Kabler til cykler
de: Fahrradkabel
es: Cables para bicicletas
fr: Câbles de vélo
it: Cavi per bicicletta
ja: 自転車用ケーブル
nl: Fietskabels
no: Sykkelkabler
pl: Linki rowerowe
pt: Cabos de bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные тросы
sv: Cykelvajrar
tr: Bisiklet Kabloları

en: Bicycle Drivetrain Parts
xx: Bicycle Drivetrain Parts
cs: Součásti řetězových systémů na kola
da: Cykeltransmissionsdele
de: Fahrradschaltungsteile
es: Piezas de cadenas para bicicletas
fr: Pièces de transmission de vélo
it: Parti trasmissione bicicletta
ja: 自転車駆動系パーツ
nl: Fietstandwielonderdelen
no: Deler til sykkeldrivverk
pl: Części do napędów rowerowych
pt: Peças de transmissão de bicicletas
ru: Детали ходовой части велосипеда
sv: Delar till cykelkedjor
tr: Bisiklet Aktarma Organları

en: Bicycle Bottom Brackets
xx: Bicycle Bottom Brackets
cs: Středová složení na jízdní kola
da: Cykelkrankboks
de: Tretlagergehäuse
es: Soportes inferiores para bicicletas
fr: Axe de pédalier de vélo
it: Staffe inferiori bicicletta
ja: 自転車ボトムブラケット
nl: Fietstrapassen
no: Kranklager til sykkel
pl: Suporty
pt: Movimento central de bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные каретки
sv: Vevlager för cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Göbekleri

en: Bicycle Cassettes & Freewheels
xx: Bicycle Cassettes & Freewheels
cs: Šroubovací/kazetová vícekolečka na jízdní kola
da: Cykelkassetter
de: Fahrradkassetten
es: Cassettes y piñones libres para bicicletas
fr: Cassettes et roues libres de vélo
it: Pignoni e cassette per bicicletta
ja: 自転車スプロケット
nl: Fietscassettes en freewheels
no: Sykkelkranser og -frihjul
pl: Kasety rowerowe
pt: Cassetes e Catracas para bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные кассеты звездочек
sv: Cykelkassetter
tr: Bisiklet Rubleleri

en: Bicycle Chainrings
xx: Bicycle Chainrings
cs: Ozubená kola pro jízdní kola
da: Cykelkædekrans
de: Fahrradkettenkränze
es: Coronas para bicicletas
fr: Pignons de vélo
it: Corone per bicicletta
ja: 自転車チェーンリング
nl: Fietstandwielen
no: Sykkelkrankdrev
pl: Zębatki
pt: Anéis de corrente para bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные передние звездочки
sv: Kedjekransar för cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Ayna Dişlisi

en: Bicycle Chains
xx: Bicycle Chains
cs: Řetězy na kola
da: Cykelkæder
de: Fahrradketten
es: Cadenas para bicicletas
fr: Chaînes de vélo, Chaîne de vélo
it: Catene da bici
ja: 自転車チェーン
nl: Fietskettingen
no: Sykkelkjeder
pl: Łańcuchy rowerowe
pt: Correntes para bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные цепи
sv: Cykelkedjor
tr: Bisiklet Zinciri

en: Bicycle Cranks
xx: Bicycle Cranks
cs: Kliky na jízdní kola
da: Cykelkranke
de: Fahrradkurbeln
es: Bielas para bicicletas
fr: Pédaliers de vélo
it: Pedali da bici
ja: 自転車クランク
nl: Fietstrappers
no: Sykkelkranker
pl: Korby rowerowe
pt: Manivelas do pedal para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные шатуны
sv: Vevpartier för cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Aynakolları

en: Bicycle Derailleurs
xx: Bicycle Derailleurs
cs: Přehazovačky na kola
da: Cykelgearsæt
de: Fahrradgangschaltungen
es: Mecanismo de cambio para bicicletas
fr: Dérailleurs de vélo
it: Cambio di velocità bici
ja: 自転車ディレイラー
nl: Fietsderailleur
no: Avhoppsgir for sykler
pl: Przerzutki rowerowe
pt: Mecanismos de marcha para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные переключатели передач
sv: Cykelväxlar
tr: Bisiklet Vitesleri

en: Bicycle Pedals
xx: Bicycle Pedals
cs: Pedály na kola
da: Cykelpedaler
de: Fahrradpedale
es: Pedales para bicicletas
fr: Pédales de vélo, Pédale de vélo
it: Pedali per bicicletta
ja: 自転車ペダル
nl: Fietspedalen
no: Sykkelpedaler
pl: Pedały
pt: Pedais para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные педали
sv: Cykelpedaler
tr: Bisiklet Pedalları

en: Bicycle Shifters
xx: Bicycle Shifters
cs: Páčky přehazovaček na kola
da: Cykelgearskiftere
de: Fahrradschalthebel
es: Palancas de cambio para bicicletas
fr: Leviers de vitesses de vélo
it: Leve cambio per bicicletta
ja: 自転車ギアシフター
nl: Fietsversnellingen
no: Sykkelgirvelgere
pl: Manetki
pt: Alavanca de marchas para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные переключатели скоростей
sv: Växelreglage för cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Vites Kolları

en: Bicycle Forks
xx: Bicycle Forks
cs: Vidlice na kola
da: Cykelforgafler
de: Fahrradgabeln
es: Horquillas para bicicletas
fr: Fourches de vélo, Fourche de vélo
it: Forcelle per bicicletta
ja: 自転車用フロントフォーク
nl: Fietsvorken
no: Sykkelgafler
pl: Widelce rowerowe
pt: Garfos para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные вилки
sv: Cykelframgafflar
tr: Bisiklet Maşaları

en: Bicycle Frames
xx: Bicycle Frames
cs: Rámy kol
da: Cykelstel
de: Fahrradrahmen
es: Cuadros para bicicletas
fr: Cadres de vélo, Cadre de vélo
it: Telai per bicicletta
ja: 自転車フレーム
nl: Fietsframes
no: Sykkelrammer
pl: Ramy
pt: Quadros de bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные рамы
sv: Cykelramar
tr: Bisiklet Kadroları

en: Bicycle Groupsets
xx: Bicycle Groupsets
cs: Sady na jízdní kola
da: Gear og transmissionssæt til cykler
de: Fahrrad-Groupsets
es: Grupos para bicicletas
fr: Kits pour vélo
it: Kit per biciclette
ja: 自転車コンポーネント
nl: Groepssets voor fietsen
no: Gruppesett for sykler
pl: Grupy osprzętu do rowerów
pt: Conjuntos de peças de bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные групсеты
sv: Komponentsatser för cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Grupsetleri

en: Bicycle Handlebar Extensions
xx: Bicycle Handlebar Extensions
cs: Prodloužení řidítek kola
da: Cykelstyrforlængere
de: Fahrradlenkerverlängerungen
es: Extensiones para manillares de bicicleta
fr: Extensions de guidons de vélo
it: Estensioni per manubri da biciclette
ja: 自転車用エクステンションバー
nl: Fietsstuurverlengers
no: Sykkelstyreforlengere
pl: Rogi rowerowe
pt: Extensões para guidões
ru: Удлинители велосипедных ручек
sv: Förlängningar till cykelstyren
tr: Bisiklet Gidon Uzantıları

en: Bicycle Handlebars
xx: Bicycle Handlebars
cs: Řídítka ke kolům
da: Cykelstyr
de: Fahrradlenkstangen
es: Manillares para bicicletas
fr: Guidons de vélo, Guidon de vélo
it: Manubri per bicicletta
ja: 自転車用ハンドル
nl: Fietssturen
no: Sykkelstyrer
pl: Kierownice rowerowe
pt: Guidões para bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные рули
sv: Cykelstyren
tr: Bisiklet Gidonları

en: Bicycle Headset Parts
xx: Bicycle Headset Parts
cs: Součástky hlavového složení jízdních kol
da: Dele til styrhoveder til cykler
de: Fahrradlenkkopf-Teile
es: Piezas de dirección para bicicletas
fr: Pièces de direction pour vélo
it: Componenti per sterzo di biciclette
ja: 自転車用ヘッドセットパーツ
nl: Balhoofdonderdelen voor fietsen
no: Deler til styrelager for sykkel
pl: Części do sterów
pt: Peças para caixa de direção de bicicleta
ru: Детали для рулевых колонок велосипедов
sv: Headsetdelar för cykel
tr: Bisiklet Furç Takımı Parçaları

en: Bicycle Headset Bearings
xx: Bicycle Headset Bearings
cs: Ložiska hlavového složení jízdních kol
da: Kuglelejer til styrhoveder til cykler
de: Fahrradlenkkopf-Halterungen
es: Cojinetes de dirección para bicicletas
fr: Roulements de direction pour vélo
it: Cuscinetti per sterzo di biciclette
ja: 自転車用ヘッドセットベアリング
nl: Balhoofdlagers
no: Kulering til styrelager for sykkel
pl: Łożyska sterów
pt: Rolamentos para caixa de direção da bicicleta
ru: Подшипники для рулевых колонок велосипедов
sv: Headsetlager för cykel
tr: Bisiklet Furç Takımı Rulmanları

en: Bicycle Headset Spacers
xx: Bicycle Headset Spacers
cs: Rozpěrky hlavového složení jízdních kol
da: Afstandsstykker til styrhoveder til cykler
de: Fahrradlenkkopf-Abstandsringe
es: Espaciadores de dirección para bicicletas
fr: Entretoises de direction pour vélo
it: Distanziali per sterzo di biciclette
ja: 自転車用ヘッドセットスペーサー
nl: Balhoofdspacers
no: Spacere for styrelager til sykkel
pl: Dystanse sterów
pt: Espaçadores para caixa de direção de bicicleta
ru: Кольца для рулевых колонок велосипедов
sv: Headsetmellanlägg för cykel
tr: Bisiklet Furç Takımı Ara Tutucuları

en: Bicycle Headsets
xx: Bicycle Headsets
cs: Hlavová složení jízdních kol
da: Styrhoveder til cykler
de: Fahrradlenkköpfe
es: Direcciones para bicicletas
fr: Jeux de direction pour vélos
it: Sterzo per biciclette
ja: 自転車用ヘッドセット
nl: Balhoofden voor fietsen
no: Styrelagre til sykkel
pl: Stery rowerowe
pt: Caixas de direção de bicicleta
ru: Рулевые колонки велосипедов
sv: Headsets för cykel
tr: Bisiklet Furç Takımları